Montana, session 2025, HB744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-15-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-15-301. License required -- exception -- rulemaking. (1) A license must be issued to qualified
persons either in speech-language pathology or audiology. A person may be licensed in both areas if the
person meets the respective qualifications, and in those instances, the license fee must be as though for one
license.
(2) A person may not practice or represent to the public that the person is a speech-language
pathologist, an audiologist, a speech-language pathology assistant, or an audiology assistant in this state
unless the person is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(3) The board may issue a limited license to qualified individuals engaged in supervised
professional experience, as defined by board rule.
(4) The board shall establish by rule the qualifications and permitted activities for speech-
language pathology aides and audiology aides who are employed by a school district as defined in 20-6-101.
The rules may not require the speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide employed by a school district
to be licensed by the board. The rules adopted by the board may not be more restrictive than the requirements
in subsection (5).
(5) A speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide employed by a school district:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 744
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 744
(a) is not required to be licensed by the board;
(b) shall work under the supervision of a speech-language pathologist or an audiologist a minimum
of 20% of the time; and
(c) may not perform work that requires the independent judgment of a speech-language
pathologist or audiologist."
Section 2. Section 37-15-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-15-301. License required -- exception -- rulemaking. (1) A license must be issued to qualified
persons either in speech-language pathology or audiology. A person may be licensed in both areas if the
person meets the respective qualifications, and in those instances, the license fee must be as though for one
license.
(2) A person may not practice or represent to the public that the person is a speech-language
pathologist, an audiologist, a speech-language pathology assistant, or an audiology assistant in this state
unless the person is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(3) The board may issue a limited license to qualified individuals engaged in supervised
professional experience, as defined by board rule.
(4) The board shall establish by rule the qualifications and permitted activities for speech-language
pathology aides and audiology aides who are employed by a school district as defined in 20-6-101. The rules
may not require the speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide employed by a school district to be
licensed by the board."
Section 3. Effective date -- contingent effective date. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2),
[this act] is effective on passage and approval.
(2) [Section 2] is effective 30 days after the date of the final adoption of rules to implement the
provisions of [section 1(4) and (5)] by the board of speech-language pathologists and audiologists.
Section 4. Contingent termination. [Section 1] terminates 30 days after the date of the final
adoption of rules to implement the provisions of [sections 1(4) and (5)] by the board of speech-language
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 744
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 744
pathologists and audiologists. The department of labor and industry shall submit certification to the code
commissioner within 14 days of the occurrence of the contingency.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 744
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 744, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 744
INTRODUCED BY M. NIKOLAKAKOS, E. TILLEMAN, E. BUTTREY, L. JONES, J. KASSMIER, G. LAMMERS,
J. ETCHART, L. REKSTEN, M. ROMANO, J. LYNCH
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY AIDES AND AUDIOLOGY AIDES; PROVIDING
THAT A SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY AIDE OR AUDIOLOGY AIDE IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE
LICENSED; PROVIDING REQUIREMENTS FOR A SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY AIDE OR
AUDIOLOGY AIDE; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AND AMENDING SECTION 37-15-301, MCA;
AND PROVIDING EFFECTIVE DATES AND A CONTINGENT TERMINATION DATE.”